Tennessee statutes. Title 38 Prevention And Detection Of Crime
Chapter 13

Law Enforcement Advisory Council [Repealed]

38-13-101. [Repealed.]

Acts 1998, ch. 994, § 7; repealed by Acts 2013, ch. 201, § 1, effective April 23, 2013.Acts 1998, ch. 994, § 7; 2013, ch. 236, § 34; repealed by Acts 2013, ch. 201, § 1, effective April 23, 2013.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 13, §§ 38-13-101 — 38-13-104, concerned the Law Enforcement Advisory Council.

38-13-102. [Repealed.]

Acts 1998, ch. 994, § 7; 2013, ch. 236, § 34; repealed by Acts 2013, ch. 201, § 1, effective April 23, 2013.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 13, §§ 38-13-101 — 38-13-104, concerned the Law Enforcement Advisory Council.

38-13-103. [Repealed.]

Acts 1998, ch. 994, § 7; repealed by Acts 2013, ch. 201, § 1, effective April 23, 2013.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 13, §§ 38-13-101 – 38-13-104, concerned the Law Enforcement Advisory Council.

38-13-104. [Repealed.]

Acts 1998, ch. 994, § 7; repealed by Acts 2013, ch. 201, § 1, effective April 23, 2013.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 13, §§ 38-13-101 – 38-13-104, concerned the Law Enforcement Advisory Council.